Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB203.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 1502(a) and 1503 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, are amended to read:Section 1502. Days Schools not to be Kept Open.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (c), no school shall be kept open on any Saturday for the purpose of ordinary instruction, except when Monday is fixed by the board of school directors as the weekly holiday, or on Sunday, Memorial Day, Fourth of July, [Christmas, Thanksgiving,] Veterans' Day, Thanksgiving, Christmas, the First of January and up to five additional days designated as local holidays in the adopted school calendar by 1234567891011121314151617181920 the board of school directors as official local school district holidays, nor shall any school be kept open in any district during the time of holding the teachers' institute for such district. The board of school directors may cancel any day designated as a local holiday in the event of a weather emergency or natural disaster.* * *Section 1503. Additional Holidays; Vacations.--The board of school directors in any district shall, by a majority vote, decide which other holidays may be observed by special exercises, and on which holidays, if any, the schools shall be closed during the whole or part of the day. [The board of school directors of each district shall require that each school within such district observes Veterans' Day by special exercises.] The board of school directors may provide for such vacations in its district as it deems wise. No days on which the schools are closed shall be counted as days taught.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0203PN0151 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718